es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno > Esquí y snowboard > Fijaciones de esquí: Fijaciones de esquí alpino; Fijaciones de esquí de travesía alpino; Fijaciones de esquí de fondo; Fijaciones de esquí telemark
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten > Skisport & Snowboarden > Skibindungen: Alpin-Skibindungen; Touren-Skibindungen; Langlauf-Skibindungen; Telemark-Skibindungen
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動 > 單/雙板滑雪 > 滑雪固定器: 高山雙板滑雪板固定器; 高山巡迴雙板滑雪板固定器; 越野雙板滑雪板固定器; 泰勒馬克雙板滑雪板固定器
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver > Ski et snowboard > Fixations pour skis: Fixations de ski alpin; Fixations de ski de randonnée alpine; Fixations de ski de fond; Fixations de télémark
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ > スキー・スノーボード用品 > スキー用ビンディング: アルペンスキー用ビンディング; アルパインツーリングスキー用ビンディング; クロスカントリースキー用ビンディング; テレマークスキー用ビンディング
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno > Esqui e snowboard > Fixadores de esqui: Fixações de ski alpino; Fixações de ski de travessia alpina; Fixações de ski de fundo; Fixações de ski de telemark
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity > Lyžování a snowboarding > Lyžařská vázání: Vázání na sjezdové lyže; Vázání na skialpy; Vázání na běžky; Telemarková vázání
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti > Smučanje in deskanje na snegu > Smučarske vezi: Vezi za alpsko smučanje; Vezi za turno smučanje; Vezi za tek na smučeh; Telemark vezi
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri > Kayak ve Snowboard > Kayak Bağlantıları: Alp disiplini kayak bağlamaları; Tur kayağı bağlamaları; Kros kayak bağlamaları; Telemark kayak bağlamaları
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities > Skiing & Snowboarding > Ski Bindings: Alpine Ski Bindings; Alpine Touring Ski Bindings; Cross-Country Ski Bindings; Telemark Ski Bindings
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες > Σκι & σνόουμπορντ > Δέστρες σκι: Δέστρες αλπικού σκι; Δέστρες ορειβατικού σκι; Δέστρες σκι αντοχής; Δέστρες σκι Telemark
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti > Skijanje i snowboardanje > Skijaški vezovi: Alpski skijaški vezovi; Alpski turno skijaški vezovi; Cross-country skijaški vezovi; Telemark skijaški vezovi
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности > Каране на ски и сноуборд > Ски автомати: Автомати за алпийски ски; ски автомати за ски алпийски туринг; Ски автомати за ски бягане; Автомати за ски телемарк
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter > Ski og snowboard > Skibindinger: Alpine skibindinger; Alpine touring-skibindinger; Langrendsbindinger; Telemarksbindinger
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą > Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie > Wiązania do nart: Zjazdowe wiązania narciarskie; Skiturowe wiązania narciarskie; Biegowe wiązania narciarskie; Telemarkowe wiązania narciarskie
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek > Síelés és snowboardozás > Síléckötők: Alpesisí-kötések; Túrasíkötések; Sífutókötések; Telemark síkötések
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno > Esqui e snowboarding > Fixações de esqui: Fixações para esqui alpino; Fixações para esqui alpino de travessia; Fixações para esqui cross-country; Fixações para esqui telemark
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten > Skiën en snowboarden > Skibindingen: Alpineskibindingen; Toerskibindingen; Langlaufbindingen; Telemarkbindingen
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali > Sci e snowboard > Attacchi da sci: Attacchi da sci alpino; Attacchi da scialpinismo; Attacchi da sci di fondo; Attacchi da telemark
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông > Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết > Khớp nối gắn giày trượt và ván trượt tuyết: Ngàm gắn giày trượt tuyết đổ đèo; Ngàm gắn giày trượt tuyết đường dài đổ đèo; Ngàm gắn giày trượt tuyết băng đồng; Ngàm gắn giày trượt tuyết telemark
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры > Лыжный спорт и сноубординг > Крепления для лыж: Горнолыжные крепления; Крепления для ски-тура; Крепления для беговых лыж; Крепления для телемарка
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset > Hiihto ja lumilautailu > Suksisiteet: Laskettelusiteet; Vapaalaskusiteet; Maastohiihtositeet; Telemark-siteet
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla > Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas > Slidžių apkaustai: Kalnų slidinėjimo apkaustai; Kalnų turistinių slidžių apkaustai; Lygumų slidžių apkaustai; Telemarko slidžių apkaustai
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티 > 스키/스노보드 > 스키 바인딩: 알파인 스키 바인딩; 알파인 투어링 스키 바인딩; 크로스컨트리 스키 바인딩; 텔레마크 스키 바인딩
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter > Ski- og snowboardutstyr > Skibindinger: Alpinbindinger; Toppturbindinger; Langrennsbindinger; Telemarksbindinger
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity > Lyžovanie a snowboarding > Lyžiarske viazanie: Viazania na zjazdové lyžovanie; Viazania na skialpové lyže; Viazania na bežecké lyže; Viazania na telemarkové lyže
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter > Skid- och snowboardåkning > Skidbindningar: Alpina skidbindningar; Bindningar för toppturskidor; Längdskidbindningar; Telemarksbindningar
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动 > 滑雪与单板滑雪 > 滑雪固定装置: 高山滑雪固定器; 高山越野滑雪固定器; 越野滑雪固定器; 泰勒马克滑雪固定器
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă > Schi și snowboarding > Legături pentru schiuri: Legături de schi alpin; Legături de schi pentru ture alpine; Legături de schi fond; Legături de schi telemark
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว > สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด > ที่ยึดสกี: ไบดิ้งสกีอัลไพน์; ไบดิ้งสกีอัลไพน์ทัวร์ริ่ง; ไบดิ้งสกีครอสคันทรี; ไบดิ้งสกีเทเลมาร์ก